North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 5. Procedures for Admission and Discharge of Clients.

Part 1. General Provisions.

§ 122C-201.
Declaration of policy.

It is State policy to encourage voluntary admissions to facilities. It is further State policy that no individual shall be involuntarily committed to a 24-hour facility unless that individual is mentally ill or a substance abuser and dangerous to self or others. All admissions and commitments shall be accomplished under conditions that protect the dignity and constitutional rights of the individual.

It is further State policy that, except as provided in G.S. 122C-212(b), individuals who have been voluntarily admitted shall be discharged upon application and that involuntarily committed individuals shall be discharged as soon as a less restrictive mode of treatment is appropriate.

History.

1973, c. 723, s. 1; c. 726, s. 1; c. 1084; c. 1408, s. 1; 1977, c. 400, s. 1; 1979, c. 915, ss. 2, 11; 1983, c. 638, s. 1; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 739, s. 2.

§ 122C-202.
Applicability of Article.

This Article applies to all facilities unless expressly provided otherwise. Specific provisions that are delineated by the disability of the client, whether the client has a mental illness, has an intellectual or other developmental disability, or is a substance abuser, also apply to all facilities for that client’s disability. Provisions that refer to a specific facility or type of facility apply only to the designated facility or facilities.

History.

1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1989, c. 625, s. 20; 2019-76, s. 4.

§ 122C-202.1.
Hospital privileges.

Nothing in this Article related to admission, commitment, or treatment shall be deemed to mandate hospitals to grant or deny to any individuals privileges to practice in hospitals.

History.

1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-202.2.
LME/MCO community crisis services plan; commitment examiners; transporting agencies; training; collaboration.

Every LME/MCO shall adopt a community crisis services plan in accordance with this section to facilitate first examination in conjunction with a health screening at the same location required pursuant to Parts 7 and 8 of this Article within its catchment area. The community crisis services plan for the LME/MCO’s catchment area shall be comprised of separate plans, known as “local area crisis services plans” for each of the local areas or regions within the catchment area that the LME/MCO identifies as an appropriate local planning area, taking into consideration the available resources and interested stakeholders within a particular geographic area or region of the catchment area. Each LME/MCO may determine the number and geographic boundaries of the local planning areas within its catchment area. Each local area crisis services plan shall, for the local area covered by the local plan, do at least all of the following:

Incorporate the involuntary commitment transportation agreement adopted pursuant to G.S. 122C-251(g) for the cities and counties within the local planning areas which identifies the law enforcement officers, designees under G.S. 122C-251(g), or individuals or entities otherwise required to provide custody and transportation of a respondent for a first examination in conjunction with a health screening at the same location required by

G.S. 122C-263

(a) and

G.S. 122C-283

. Notwithstanding the foregoing, counties and cities shall retain the responsibilities for custody and transportation set forth in this Article, except as otherwise set forth in a plan developed, agreed upon, and adopted in compliance with this section and G.S. 122C-251(g).

Identify one or more area facilities or other locations in accordance with

G.S. 122C-263

and

G.S. 122C-283

. Each LME/MCO shall contract with one or more facilities or other locations described in G.S. 122C-263 and G.S. 122C-283 for the provision of health screenings and first examinations required by G.S. 122C-263 and G.S. 122C-283 for the provision of first examination in conjunction with a health screening required by G.S. 122C-263 and G.S. 122C-283, to meet the needs of its local planning area.

Identify available training for law enforcement personnel and other persons designated or required under G.S. 122C-251(g) to provide transportation and custody of involuntary commitment respondents. Law enforcement officers may request to participate in the training program identified by the LME/MCO. Persons who are designated in compliance with G.S. 122C-251(g) to provide all or part of the transportation and custody required for involuntary commitment proceedings under this Article and who are not law enforcement officers shall participate in the training. To the extent feasible, the identified training shall address the use of de-escalation strategies and techniques, the safe use of force and restraint, respondent rights relevant to custody and transportation, the location of any area facilities identified by the LME/MCO pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, and the completion and return of the custody order to the clerk of superior court. The training identified by the LME/MCO may be comprised of one or more programs and may include a Crisis Intervention Team program or other mental health training program or a combination of these programs.

Law enforcement agencies, acute care hospitals, magistrates, area facilities with identified commitment examiners, and other affected agencies shall participate with the LME/MCO in the development of the local area crisis services plans described in this section. Other stakeholders and community partners identified by the LME/MCO may be invited to participate in the planning. No local area crisis services plan developed under this section shall be adopted or thereafter be effective or implemented unless such plan first has been mutually agreed upon in writing by all entities identified in the plan pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. If any member of the Crisis Planning Committee fails to agree to the plan in writing, the Secretary shall develop a procedure to attempt to resolve the conflict in order to achieve approval of the Plan.

The plans adopted under this section may, by mutual agreement of all entities identified in the plan, address any other matters necessary to facilitate the custody, transportation, examination, and treatment of respondents to commitment proceedings under Parts 7 and 8 of this Article.

History.

2018-33, s. 8.

§ 122C-203.
Admission or commitment and incompetency proceedings to have no effect on one another.

The admission or commitment to a facility of an individual who allegedly has a mental illness, an alleged substance abuser, or an individual who allegedly has an intellectual or other developmental disability under the provisions of this Article shall in no way affect incompetency proceedings as set forth in Chapter 35A or former Chapters 33 or 35 of the General Statutes and incompetency proceedings under those Chapters shall have no effect upon admission or commitment proceedings under this Article.

History.

1963, c. 1184, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1989, c. 625, s. 21; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 26(b); 2019-76, s. 5.

§ 122C-204.
Civil liability for corruptly attempting admission or commitment.

Nothing in this Article relieves from liability in any suit instituted in the courts of this State any individual who unlawfully, maliciously, and corruptly attempts to admit or commit any individual to any facility under this Article.

History.

1963, c. 1184, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-205.
Return of clients to 24-hour facilities.

When a client of a 24-hour facility who:

Has been involuntarily committed;

Is being detained pending a judicial hearing;

Has been voluntarily admitted but is a minor or incompetent adult;

Has been placed on conditional release from the facility; or

Has been involuntarily committed or voluntarily admitted and is the subject of a detainer placed with the 24-hour facility by an appropriate official

escapes or breaches a condition of his release, if applicable, the responsible professional shall notify or cause to be notified immediately the appropriate law enforcement agency in the county of residence of the client, the appropriate law enforcement agency in the county where the facility is located, and the appropriate law enforcement agency in any county where there are reasonable grounds to believe that the client may be found. The responsible professional shall determine the amount of personal identifying and background information reasonably necessary to divulge to the law enforcement agency or agencies under the particular circumstances involved in order to assure the expeditious return of the client to the 24-hour facility involved and protect the general public.

When a competent adult who has been voluntarily admitted to a 24-hour facility escapes or breaches a condition of his release, the responsible professional, in the exercise of accepted professional judgment, practice, and standards, will determine if it is reasonably foreseeable that:

The client may cause physical harm to others or himself;

The client may cause damage to property;

The client may commit a felony or a violent misdemeanor; or

That the health or safety of the client may be endangered

unless he is immediately returned to the facility. If the responsible professional finds that any or all of these occurrences are reasonably foreseeable, he will follow the same procedures as those set forth in subsection (a) of this section.

Upon receipt of notice of an escape or breach of a condition of release as described in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, an appropriate law enforcement officer shall take the client into custody and have the client returned to the 24-hour facility from which the client has escaped or has been conditionally released. Transportation of the client back to the 24-hour facility shall be provided in the same manner as described in

G.S. 122C-251

and

G.S. 122C-408(b)

. Law enforcement agencies who are notified of a client’s escape or breach of conditional release shall be notified of the client’s return by the responsible 24-hour facility. Under the circumstances described in this section, the initial notification by the 24-hour facility of the client’s escape or breach of conditional release shall be given by telephone communication to the appropriate law enforcement agency or agencies and, if available and appropriate, by Department of Public Safety message to any law enforcement agency in or out of state and by entry into the National Crime Information Center (NCIC) telecommunications system. As soon as reasonably possible following notification, written authorization to take the client into custody shall also be issued by the 24-hour facility. Under this section, law enforcement officers shall have the authority to take a client into custody upon receipt of the telephone notification or Department of Public Safety message prior to receiving written authorization. The notification of a law enforcement agency does not, in and of itself, render this information public information within the purview of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. However, the responsible law enforcement agency shall determine the extent of disclosure of personal identifying and background information reasonably necessary, under the circumstances, in order to assure the expeditious return of a client to the 24-hour facility involved and to protect the general public and is authorized to make such disclosure. The responsible law enforcement agency may also place any appropriate message or entry into either the Department of Public Safety’s Criminal Information System or National Crime Information System, or both, as appropriate.

In the situations described in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the responsible professional shall also notify or cause to be notified as soon as practicable:

The next of kin of the client or legally responsible person for the client;

The clerk of superior court of the county of commitment of the client;

The area authority of the county of residence of the client, if appropriate;

The physician or eligible psychologist who performed the first examination for a commitment of the client, if appropriate; and

Any official who has placed a detainer on a client as described in subdivision (a)(5) of this section

of the escape or breach of condition of the client’s release upon occurrence of either action and of his subsequent return to the facility.

History.

1899, c. 1, s. 27; Rev., s. 4563; C.S., s. 6175; 1927, c. 114; 1945, c. 952, s. 12; 1953, c. 256, s. 1; 1955, c. 887, s. 3; 1973, c. 673, s. 11; 1983, c. 548; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, s. 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 863, ss. 12-14; 1987, c. 749, s. 1; 2014-100, s. 17.1(eee).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(eee), effective July 1, 2014, in subsection (c), substituted “Department of Public Safety” for “Division of Criminal Information (DCI)” or similar language in the fourth and sixth sentences, and substituted “Department of Public Safety’s Criminal Information System” for “Division of Criminal Information System” in the last sentence.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Protection Rights.

See opinion of Attorney General to Lena Davis, Broughton Hospital, 41 N.C.A.G. 900 (1972), rendered under former statutory provisions.

§ 122C-205.1.
Discharge of clients who escape or breach the condition of release.

As described in G.S. 122C-205(a), when a client of a 24-hour facility escapes or breaches the condition of his release and does not return to the facility, the facility shall:

If the client was admitted under Part 2 of this Article or under Parts 3 or 4 of this Article to a nonrestrictive facility, discharge the client based on the professional judgment of the responsible professional;

If the client was admitted under Part 3 or Part 4 of this Article to a restrictive facility, discharge the client when the period for continued treatment, as specified by the court, expires;

If the client was admitted pending a district court hearing under Part 7 of this Article, request that the court consider dismissal or continuance of the case at the initial district court hearing; or

If the client was committed under Part 7 of this Article, discharge the client when the commitment expires.

As described in G.S. 122C-205(a), when a client of a 24-hour facility who was admitted under Part 8 of this Article escapes or breaches the conditions of his release and does not return to the facility, the facility may discharge the client from the facility based on the professional judgment of the responsible professional and following consultation with the appropriate area authority or physician.

Upon discharge of the client, the 24-hour facility shall notify all the persons directed to be notified of the client’s escape or breach of conditional release under 122C-205(a), (b) and (d) that the client has been discharged.

If the client is returned to the 24-hour facility subsequent to discharge from the facility, applicable admission or commitment procedures shall be followed, when appropriate.

History.

1987, c. 674, s. 1.

§ 122C-206.
Transfers of clients between 24-hour facilities; transfer of clients from 24-hour facilities to acute care hospitals.

Before transferring a voluntary adult client from one 24-hour facility to another, the responsible professional at the original facility shall: (i) get authorization from the receiving facility that the facility will admit the client; (ii) get consent from the client; and (iii) if consent to share information is granted by the client, or if the disclosure of information is permitted under G.S. 122C-53(b), notify the next of kin of the time and location of the transfer. The preceding requirements of this paragraph may be waived if the client has been admitted under emergency procedures to a State facility not serving the client’s region of the State. Following an emergency admission, the client may be transferred to the appropriate State facility without consent according to the rules of the Commission.

Before transferring a respondent held for a district court hearing or a committed respondent from one 24-hour facility to another, the responsible professional at the original facility shall:

Obtain authorization from the receiving facility that the facility will admit the respondent; and

Provide reasonable notice to the respondent or the legally responsible person, and to the respondent’s counsel, of the reason for the transfer and document the notice in the client’s record.No later than 24 hours after the transfer, the responsible professional at the original facility shall notify the petitioner, the clerk of court, the respondent’s counsel, and, if consent is granted by the respondent, or if the disclosure of the information is permitted under

G.S. 122C-53

or other applicable law, the next of kin, that the transfer is complete. If the transfer is completed before the judicial commitment hearing, these proceedings shall be initiated by the receiving facility. If the respondent is a minor, an incompetent adult, or is deemed incapable, then the responsible professional at the original facility shall, not later than 24 hours after the transfer, notify the respondent’s legally responsible person of the location of the transfer and that the transfer is complete.

Minors and incompetent adults, admitted pursuant to Parts 3 and 4 of this Article, may be transferred from one 24-hour facility to another following the same procedures specified in subsection (b) of this section. In addition, the legally responsible person shall be consulted before the proposed transfer and notified, within 24 hours after the transfer is complete, of the location of the transfer and that the transfer is complete. If the transfer is completed before the judicial determination required in

G.S. 122C-223

or

G.S. 122C-232

, these proceedings shall be initiated by the receiving facility.

(c1)

If a client described in subsections (b) or (c) of this section is to be transferred from one 24-hour facility to another, or to an acute care hospital pursuant to subsection (e) of this section, and transportation is needed, the responsible professional at the original facility shall notify the clerk of court or magistrate, and the clerk of court or magistrate shall issue a custody order for transportation of the client as provided by

G.S. 122C-251

.

Minors and incompetent adults, admitted pursuant to Part 5 of this Article and incapable adults admitted pursuant to Part 2A of this Article, may be transferred from one 24-hour facility to another provided that prior to transfer the responsible professional at the original facility shall:

Obtain authorization from the receiving facility that the facility will admit the client; and

Provide reasonable notice to the client regarding the reason for transfer and document the notice in the client’s record; and

Provide reasonable notice to and consult with the legally responsible person regarding the reason for the transfer and document the notice and consultation in the client’s record.No later than 24 hours after the transfer, the responsible professional at the original facility shall notify the legally responsible person that the transfer is completed.

The responsible professional may transfer a client from one 24-hour facility to another or to an acute care hospital for emergency medical treatment, emergency medical evaluation, or emergency surgery without notice to or consent from the client. Within a reasonable period of time the responsible professional shall notify the next of kin or the legally responsible person of the client of the transfer.

When a client is transferred from one 24-hour facility to another solely for medical reasons, the client shall be returned to the original facility when the medical care is completed unless the responsible professionals at both facilities concur that discharge of the client who is not subject to G.S. 122C-266(b) is appropriate.

(f1)

When a client is transferred from a 24-hour facility to an acute care hospital solely for medical reasons, the hospital shall return the client to the original facility as soon as the next client space becomes available at the original facility after completion of the client’s medical care. With the exception of facility-based crisis centers, the original facility must allow at least 12 hours for the client’s return before assigning the client’s room or bed to another patient, unless both facilities agree that return of the client in this time period is not feasible. The original facility must accept the return of the client in priority over other clients seeking admission, except in the cases of patients designated incapable to proceed to trial by court order. If the responsible professionals at both facilities concur that discharge of a client who is not subject to G.S. 122C-266(b) is appropriate, the client may be discharged. If, at the time of the transfer, a client is being held under a custody order pending a second commitment examination or a district court hearing under involuntary commitment proceedings, the custody order shall remain valid throughout the period of time necessary to complete the client’s medical care and transport the client between the 24-hour facility and the acute care hospital; provided, however, that the requirement for a timely hearing under G.S. 122C-268(a) applies. Any decision to terminate the proceedings because the respondent no longer meets the criteria for commitment or because a hearing cannot be held within the time required by G.S. 122C-268(a) shall be documented and reported to the clerk of superior court in accordance with G.S. 122C-266(c).

The Commission may adopt rules to implement this section.

History.

1919, c. 330; C.S., s. 6163; 1925, c. 51, s. 1; 1945, c. 925, s. 5; 1947, c. 537, s. 9; c. 623, s. 1; 1953, c. 675, s. 15; 1955, c. 1274, s. 1; 1959, c. 1002, s. 11; 1963, c. 1166, ss. 10, 12; 1973, c. 475, s. 1; c. 476, s. 133; c. 673, ss. 7, 8; c. 1436, ss. 6, 7; 1977, c. 679, s. 7; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; c. 328, ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 863, s. 15; 1991, c. 704, s. 1; 2018-33, s. 9.

§ 122C-207.
Confidentiality.

Court records made in all proceedings pursuant to this Article are confidential, and are not open to the general public except as provided for by G.S. 122C-54(d).

History.

1977, c. 696, s. 1; 1979, c. 164, s. 2; c. 915, s. 20; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on the result of the 1979 statutory changes in involuntary civil commitment in North Carolina, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 985 (1982).

§ 122C-208.
Voluntary admission not admissible in involuntary proceeding.

Except when considering treatment history as it pertains to an involuntary outpatient commitment, the fact that an individual has been voluntarily admitted for treatment shall not be competent evidence in an involuntary commitment proceeding.

History.

1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-209.
Voluntary admissions acceptance.

Nothing contained in Parts 2 through 5 of this Article requires a private physician or private facility to accept an individual as a client for examination or treatment. Examination or treatment at a private facility or by a private physician is at the expense of the individual to the extent that charges are not disposed of by contract between the area authority and private facility.

History.

1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-210.
Guardian to pay expenses out of estate.

It is the duty of the guardian who has legal custody of the estate of an incompetent individual held pursuant to the provisions of this Article in a facility to supply funds for his support in the facility during the stay as long as there are sufficient funds for that purpose over and beyond maintaining and supporting those individuals who may be legally dependent on the estate.

History.

1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-210.1.
Immunity from liability.

No facility, person, or entity, including an area facility, a facility licensed under this Chapter, an acute care hospital, a general hospital, an area authority, a law enforcement officer, an LME, or an LME/MCO, or any of their officials, staff, or employees, or any other physician or individual who is responsible for the custody, transportation, examination, admission, management, supervision, treatment, or release of a respondent or client and who is not grossly negligent, is civilly or criminally liable, personally or otherwise, for that person’s or entity’s actions or omissions arising from these responsibilities or for the actions or omissions of a respondent or client. This immunity is in addition to any other legal immunity from liability to which these persons, entities, facilities, agencies, or individuals may be entitled and applies to actions performed in connection with, or arising out of, the custody, transportation, examination, commitment, admission, management, supervision, treatment, or release of any individual pursuant to or under the authority of this Article or otherwise.

History.

1899, c. 1, s. 31; Rev., s. 4560; C.S., s. 6172; 1961, c. 511, s. 1; 1973, c. 673, s. 10; 1983, c. 638, s. 15; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 739, s. 3; 2018-33, s. 10.

§ 122C-210.2.
Research at State facilities for the mentally ill.

For research purposes, State facilities for the mentally ill may be designated by the Secretary as facilities for the voluntary admission of adults who are not admissible as clients otherwise. Designation of these facilities shall be made in accordance with rules of the Secretary that assure the protection of those admitted for research purposes.

Individuals may be admitted to such designated facilities on either an outpatient or inpatient basis.

The Human Rights Committee of the designated facility shall monitor the care of individuals admitted for research during their participation in any research program.

For these individuals admitted to such designated facilities for research purposes only, the following provisions shall apply:

A written application for admission pursuant to G.S. 122C-211(a) and an examination by a physician within 24 hours of admission shall be provided to each of these individuals;

They shall be exempt from the provisions of G.S. 122C-57(a) governing the rights to treatment and to a treatment plan; the requirements of G.S. 122C-61(2) and G.S. 122C-212(b); and the requirements of any single portal of entry and exit plan; however, nothing in this section shall take away the individual’s right to be informed of the potential risks and alleged benefits of their participation in any research program;

The Secretary shall exempt these individuals from the provisions of Article 7 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes requiring payment for treatment in a State institution. The Secretary may also authorize reasonable compensation to be paid to individuals participating in research projects for their services; provided, that the compensation is paid from research grant funds; and

The Commission shall adopt rules regarding the admission, care and discharge of those individuals admitted for research purposes only.

History.

1987, c. 358, s. 1.

§ 122C-210.3.
Electronic and facsimile transmission of custody orders.

A custody order entered by the clerk or magistrate pursuant to this Chapter may be delivered to the law enforcement officer or other person designated or required to provide transportation and custody pursuant to

G.S. 122C-251

by electronic or facsimile transmission.

History.

2015-176, s. 2.5(b); 2018-33, s. 11.

§ 122C-211.
Admissions.

Except as provided in subsections (b) through (f) of this section, any individual, including a parent in a family unit, in need of treatment for mental illness or substance abuse may seek voluntary admission at any facility by presenting himself or herself for evaluation to the facility. No physician’s statement is necessary, but a written application for evaluation or admission, signed by the individual seeking admission, or the individual’s legally responsible person, is required. The application form shall be available at all times at all facilities. However, no one shall be denied admission because application forms are not available. An evaluation shall determine whether the individual is in need of care, treatment, habilitation or rehabilitation for mental illness or substance abuse or further evaluation by the facility. Information provided by family members regarding the individual’s need for treatment shall be reviewed in the evaluation. If applicable, information provided in an advance instruction for mental health treatment by the client or the client’s legally responsible person shall be reviewed in the evaluation. An individual may not be accepted as a client if the facility determines that the individual does not need or cannot benefit from the care, treatment, habilitation, or rehabilitation available and that the individual is not in need of further evaluation by the facility. The facility shall give to an individual who is denied admission a referral to another facility or facilities that may be able to provide the treatment needed by the client.

In 24-hour facilities the application shall acknowledge that the applicant may be held by the facility for a period of 72 hours after any written request for release that the applicant may make, and shall acknowledge that the 24-hour facility may have the legal right to petition for involuntary commitment of the applicant during that period. At the time of application, the facility shall tell the applicant about procedures for discharge.

Any individual who voluntarily seeks admission to a 24-hour facility in which medical care is an integral component of the treatment shall be examined and evaluated by a physician of the facility within 24 hours of admission. The evaluation shall determine whether the individual is in need of treatment for mental illness or substance abuse or further evaluation by the facility. If the evaluating physician determines that the individual will not benefit from the treatment available, the individual shall not be accepted as a client.

Any individual who voluntarily seeks admission to any 24-hour facility, other than one in which medical care is an integral component of the treatment, shall have a medical examination within 30 days before or after admission if it is reasonably expected that the individual will receive treatment for more than 30 days or shall produce a current, valid physical examination report, signed by a physician, completed within 12 months prior to the current admission. When applicable, this examination may be included in an examination conducted to meet the requirements of

G.S. 122C-223

or

G.S. 122C-232

.

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-33, s. 12, effective October 1, 2019, and applicable to proceedings initiated on or after that date.

A family unit may voluntarily seek admission to a 24-hour substance abuse facility that is able to provide, directly or by contract, treatment, habilitation, or rehabilitation services that will specifically address the family unit’s needs. These services shall include gender-specific substance abuse treatment, habilitation, or rehabilitation for the parent as well as assessment, well-child care, and, as needed, early intervention services for the child. A family unit that voluntarily seeks admission to a 24-hour substance abuse facility shall be evaluated by the facility to determine whether the family unit would benefit from the services of the facility. A facility shall not accept a family unit as a client if the facility determines that the family unit does not need or cannot benefit from the care, habilitation, or rehabilitation available at the facility. The facility shall give to a family unit that is denied admission a referral to another facility or facilities that may be able to provide treatment needed by the family unit. Except as otherwise provided, this section applies to a parent in a family unit seeking admission under this section.

(f1)

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-33, s. 12, effective October 1, 2019, and applicable to proceedings initiated on or after that date.

As used in this Part, the term “family unit” means a parent and the parent’s dependent children under the age of three years.

History.

1945, c. 952, s. 471/2; 1963, c. 1184, s. 22; 1973, c. 723, s. 1; c. 1084; 1983, c. 383, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 863, s. 16; 1989, c. 287; 1998-47, s. 1(a); 1998-198, s. 6; 1998-217, s. 53(a)(1), (2); 1999-456, s. 5; 2018-33, s. 12.

§ 122C-212.
Discharges.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, an individual who has been voluntarily admitted to a facility shall be discharged upon the individual’s own request. A request for discharge from a 24-hour facility shall be in writing.

An individual who has been voluntarily admitted to a 24-hour facility may be held for 72 hours after the individual’s written application for discharge is submitted.

History.

1973, c. 723, s. 1; c. 1084; 1983, c. 383, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2018-33, s. 13.

§§ 122C-213 through 122C-215.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2A. Voluntary Admissions and Discharges; Incapable Adults; Facilities for Individuals With Mental Illness and Substance Use Disorder.

§ 122C-216.
Voluntary admission of individuals determined to be incapable.

An individual in need of treatment for mental illness and who is incapable, as defined in

G.S. 122C-3

and

G.S. 122C-72

, may be admitted to and treated in a facility pursuant to an advance instruction for mental health treatment executed in accordance with Part 2 of Article 3 of this Chapter or pursuant to the authority of a health care agent named in a valid health care power of attorney executed in accordance with Article 3 of Chapter 32A of the General Statutes.

Except as otherwise provided in this Part,

G.S. 122C-211

applies to admissions of incapable adults under this Part.

An advance instruction for mental health treatment shall be governed by Part 2 of Article 3 of this Chapter.

When a health care power of attorney authorizes a health care agent pursuant to

G.S. 32A-19

to make mental health treatment decisions for an incapable individual, the health care agent shall act for the individual in applying for admission and consenting to treatment at a facility, consistent with the extent and limitations of authority granted in the health care power of attorney for as long as the individual remains incapable.

A 24-hour facility may not hold an individual under a voluntary admission who is determined to be incapable at the time of admission and who is admitted pursuant to an advance instruction for mental health treatment for more than 15 days, except as provided in

G.S. 122C-211

(b); provided, however, that an individual who regains sufficient understanding and capacity to make and communicate mental health treatment decisions may elect to continue his or her admission and treatment pursuant to the individual’s informed consent in accordance with

G.S. 122C-211

. A 24-hour facility may file a petition for involuntary commitment pursuant to Article 5 of this Chapter if an individual meets applicable criteria at the conclusion of this 15-day period.

For purposes of this section, if an incapable adult in need of treatment has no health care power of attorney or advance instruction for mental health treatment that addresses the needed treatment, and the incapable adult has not been adjudicated incompetent under Chapter 35A of the General Statutes, the legally responsible person for the incapable adult shall be one of the persons listed in subdivisions (3) through (7) of subsection (c) of

G.S. 90-21.13

, to be selected based on the priority order indicated in said subdivisions (3) through (7); provided that the persons listed in subdivisions (4) through (7) of subsection (c) of

G.S. 90-21.13

shall not have the authority to admit an incapable adult to a 24-hour facility where the adult will be subject to the same or similar restrictions on freedom of movement present in the State facilities for the mentally ill.

History.

2018-33, s. 14; 2019-240, s. 26(e).

§ 122C-217.
Discharge of individuals determined to be incapable.

The responsible professional shall unconditionally discharge an individual admitted to a facility pursuant to this Part at any time it is determined the individual is no longer mentally ill or in need of treatment at the facility.

An individual who has been voluntarily admitted to a facility pursuant to this Part and who is no longer deemed incapable shall be discharged upon his or her own request. An individual’s request for discharge from a 24-hour facility shall be in writing. A facility may hold an individual who has been voluntarily admitted to a 24-hour facility pursuant to this Part for up to 72 hours after the individual submits a written request for discharge, but the facility shall release the individual upon the expiration of 72 hours following submission of the written request for discharge unless the responsible professional obtains an order under Part 7 or 8 of this Article to hold the client.

A health care agent named in a valid health care power of attorney or the legally responsible person may submit on behalf of an individual admitted to a facility under this Part a written request to have the individual discharged from the facility, provided (i) the individual remains incapable at the time of the request and (ii) the request is not inconsistent with the authority expressed in the health care power of attorney or other controlling document. A facility may hold an individual for up to 72 hours after a health care agent submits a written request for the individual’s discharge but shall release the individual upon the expiration of 72 hours following submission of the written request for discharge unless the responsible professional obtains an order under Part 7 or 8 of this Article to hold the client.

If, in the opinion of a physician or eligible psychologist, an individual admitted to a facility under this Part regains sufficient understanding and capacity to make and communicate mental health treatment decisions while in treatment, and the individual refuses to sign an authorization for continued treatment within 72 hours after regaining decisional capacity, the facility shall discharge the individual unless the responsible professional obtains an order under Part 7 or 8 of this Article to hold the client.

In any case in which an order is issued authorizing the involuntary commitment of an individual admitted to a facility under this Part, the facility’s further treatment and holding of the individual shall be in accordance with Part 7 or 8 of this Article, whichever is applicable.

History.

2018-33, s. 14.

§§ 122C-218 through 122C-220.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 3. Voluntary Admissions and Discharges,
Minors, Facilities for the Mentally Ill and
Substance Abusers.